District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.15

Severability.

If any particular provision of this subchapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this subchapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. If any action or inaction contemplated under this subchapter is determined to be contrary to the requirements of applicable law, such action or inaction shall not be necessary for the purpose of issuing of the bonds authorized by this subchapter, and the validity of the bonds shall not be adversely affected.

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 16, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-340.15.

Prior Codifications